Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB509.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"LIDAR." Speed-measuring equipment that determines target range and speed based on the time-of-flight of laser light 1234567891011121314151617181920 pulses reflected off a target. The term includes equipment that is used to gather, process and record images, as applicable, for speed enforcement purposes, including an automated speed enforcement system authorized under this title.* * *"Mechanical, electrical and electronic device." A device other than LIDAR, RADAR or RADAR in motion that calculates the rate of speed of any vehicle. The term includes a device that determines speed by measuring elapsed time between measured road surface points by using two sensors and devices which measure and calculate the average speed of a vehicle between any two points.* * *"RADAR." An electronic device that determines target range and speed based on radio microwaves reflected off a target from a stationary point. The term includes an automated speed enforcement system as authorized under this title."RADAR in motion." An electronic device that determines target range and speed based on radio microwaves reflected off a target and operated when the motor vehicle is in motion.* * *"Speedometer." The speed meter on the dashboard of a motor vehicle operated by a police officer to determine the speed of a vehicle.* * *Section 2. Section 3362(c) of Title 75 is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3362. Maximum speed limits.* * *20250SB0509PN0495 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Penalty.--* * *(3) (i) A person may not be convicted upon evidence obtained through the use of LIDAR, a mechanical, electrical and electronic device, RADAR or RADAR in motion:(A) Unless the speed recorded is 10 or more miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit.(B) When the legal speed limit exceeds 55 miles per hour, unless the speed recorded is six or more miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit.(ii) This paragraph shall not apply to evidence obtained through the use of LIDAR, a mechanical, electrical and electronic device, RADAR or RADAR in motion within a school zone or an active work zone.(4) A person may not be convicted upon evidence obtained through the use of LIDAR, a mechanical, electrical and electronic device, RADAR or RADAR in motion to time the rate of speed of vehicles within 500 feet after a speed limit sign indicating a decrease in speed. This limitation shall not apply to a speed limit sign indicating a school zone, bridge and elevated structure speed limit, hazardous grade speed limit and work zone speed limit.(d) Enforcement.--This section may be enforced by any of the following:(1) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police using LIDAR, a mechanical, electrical and electronic device, RADAR, RADAR in motion or a speedometer.(2) A local law enforcement officer, as defined under section 3362.1(g) (relating to maximum speed limits enforced 20250SB0509PN0495 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by local law enforcement officers with RADAR), using a mechanical, electrical and electronic device or speedometer.(3) A police officer of the Delaware River Port Authority on a highway under the jurisdiction of the Delaware River Port Authority using a mechanical, electrical and electronic device, RADAR or a speedometer. Before RADAR can be used, the police officer must complete training under section 3362.1(b)(2).Section 3. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3362.1. Maximum speed limits enforced by local law enforcement officers with RADAR.(a) Use of RADAR.--(1) A local law enforcement officer may use RADAR to determine the lawful speed of vehicles on local highways.(2) A local law enforcement officer may use RADAR to determine the lawful speed of vehicles on State highways if authorization is provided by a Commonwealth agency.(b) Speed enforcement restrictions.--(1) Prior to the use of RADAR by a local law enforcement officer in a municipality, the municipality, or each municipality of a regional police department, must adopt an ordinance authorizing the use of RADAR within the boundaries of the municipality.(2) A local law enforcement officer must complete a training course approved by the Pennsylvania State Police and the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission prior to using RADAR.(3) A local law enforcement officer must be in a clearly marked law enforcement vehicle in a location that is readily visible to the motoring public while using RADAR.20250SB0509PN0495 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) In accordance with department regulations, not fewer than four official traffic-control devices, including warning signs indicating the use of RADAR, shall be erected within 500 feet of the border of a municipality on not fewer than four highways entering the municipality prior to a local law enforcement officer using RADAR within the municipality's boundaries.(5) The primary use of RADAR shall be for purposes of traffic safety. The following shall apply to citations:(i) A political subdivision, regional police department or agency of the Commonwealth may not order, mandate, require or in any other manner, directly or indirectly, suggest to a local law enforcement officer to issue a certain number of citations under this subchapter on a daily, weekly, monthly, quarterly or yearly basis.(ii) The prohibition under subparagraph (i) shall not affect the conditions of a Federal or State grant or money awarded to a political subdivision, regional police department or agency of the Commonwealth and used to fund traffic enforcement programs.(c) Speed limits.--A driver may not operate a vehicle at a speed in excess of the following maximum limits:(1) Thirty-five miles per hour in an urban district.(2) Sixty-five miles per hour or 70 miles per hour for a vehicle on a freeway where the posted speed limit is 65 miles per hour or 70 miles per hour.(3) Twenty-five miles per hour in a residence district if the highway:(i) Is not a numbered traffic route.(ii) Is functionally classified by the department as 20250SB0509PN0495 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a local highway.(4) Fifty-five miles per hour in any other location.(5) Any other maximum speed limit established under this subchapter.(d) Posting of speed limits.--(1) A maximum speed limit established under subsection (c)(1), (3) or (5) shall not be effective unless posted on fixed or variable official traffic-control devices in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.(2) A maximum speed limit established under subsection (c)(2) shall not be effective unless posted on fixed or variable official traffic-control devices erected after each interchange on the portion of a highway on which the speed limit is in effect and at other locations determined by the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, as appropriate.(e) Penalty.--(1) A person violating this section commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of:(i) $42.50 for violating a maximum speed limit of 65 miles per hour or higher; or(ii) $35 for violating any other maximum speed limit.(2) A person exceeding the maximum speed limit by more than five miles per hour shall pay an additional fine of $2 per mile for each mile in excess of five miles per hour over the maximum speed limit.(3) A violation of this section based upon evidence obtained through RADAR shall result in the penalties provided 20250SB0509PN0495 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in this subsection and shall not be deemed a criminal conviction or considered cause for the issuance of points under section 1535 (relating to schedule of convictions and points).(4) Notwithstanding sections 6322 (relating to reports by issuing authorities) and 6323 (relating to reports by courts), an issuing authority or court may not report a violation of this section based upon evidence obtained through the use of RADAR to the department.(5) During the initial 90 days of speed enforcement using RADAR following adoption of the ordinance under subsection (b)(1), a person may only be sanctioned for a violation with a written warning.(6) (i) A person may not be convicted upon evidence obtained through the use of RADAR:(A) Unless the speed recorded is 10 or more miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit.(B) When the legal speed limit exceeds 55 miles per hour, unless the speed recorded is six or more miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit.(ii) This paragraph shall not apply to evidence obtained through the use of RADAR within a school zone or an active work zone.(7) A person may not be convicted upon evidence obtained through the use of RADAR to time the rate of speed of vehicles within 500 feet after a speed limit sign indicating a decrease in speed. This limitation shall not apply to a speed limit sign indicating a school zone, bridge and elevated structure speed limit, hazardous grade speed limit and work zone speed limit.20250SB0509PN0495 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Revenue limit.--(1) The following apply to a municipality that adopts an ordinance under subsection (b)(1) authorizing the use of RADAR within the boundaries of the municipality:(i) In the calendar year in which the municipality adopts the ordinance, the sum of fines that the municipality may retain for violations of this section and section 3362 (relating to maximum speed limits) shall be no more than an amount equal to 101% of the fines the municipality received for violations of section 3362 in the calendar year immediately preceding the adoption of the ordinance.(ii) In the calendar year after the municipality adopts the ordinance, and each calendar year thereafter, the sum of fines the municipality may retain for violations of this section and section 3362 shall be no more than an amount equal to 101% of the sum of fines the municipality was permitted to retain for violations of this section and section 3362 in the preceding calendar year.(2) By February 1 of the calendar year after a municipality adopts an ordinance under subsection (b)(1) authorizing a local police department to use RADAR, and each February 1 thereafter for as long as the ordinance remains in effect, a municipality shall certify to the department the fines the municipality received in the prior calendar year for violations of this section and section 3362. If the sum of fines received for violations of this section and section 3362 in the prior calendar year exceeds the amount the municipality was permitted to retain under paragraph (1), the 20250SB0509PN0495 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality shall remit the excess amount to the department for deposit into the Motor License Fund.(3) The Department of the Auditor General shall audit fines received by municipalities for violations of this section and section 3362 and amounts remitted to the department under paragraph (2) to ensure compliance with this subsection. The following shall apply regarding audits:(i) An audit shall be conducted yearly and shall audit municipalities selected at random by the Department of the Auditor General.(ii) The Department of the Auditor General shall have access to all documents it deems necessary to complete an audit.(iii) If the Department of the Auditor General determines that a municipality remitted less than the amount required under paragraph (2) in any of the most recent 10 calendar years, the department shall deduct an amount equal to 200% of the amount that the municipality did not remit from the next payment to the municipality under section 9502(a)(2)(v) (relating to imposition of tax).(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Local law enforcement officer." An employee of a local police department who is empowered to enforce 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) and this title. The term does not include a Pennsylvania State Police officer, constable, sheriff or a deputy, fire police, transit police, airport police, park ranger, university or college police game warden, 20250SB0509PN0495 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fish commission officer or railroad police."Local police department." A municipal or regional police department that:(1) is authorized by one or more municipalities;(2) provides patrol and investigative services; and(3) reports its activities monthly to the Pennsylvania State Police in accordance with the Pennsylvania Uniform Crime Reporting System as defined in section 502 of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1383, No.180), known as the Uniform Crime Reporting Act.Section 4. Section 3368(c), (d), (e) and (f) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 3368. Speed timing devices.* * *(c) [Mechanical, electrical and electronic devices authorized.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the rate of speed of any vehicle may be timed on any highway by a police officer using a mechanical or electrical speed timing device.(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), electronic devices such as radio-microwave devices, commonly referred to as electronic speed meters or radar, may be used only as part of an automated speed enforcement system or by members of the Pennsylvania State Police.(3) Electronic devices which calculate speed by measuring elapsed time between measured road surface points by using two sensors and devices which measure and calculate the average speed of a vehicle between any two points may be used by any police officer.20250SB0509PN0495 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) No person may be convicted upon evidence obtained through the use of devices authorized by paragraphs (2) and (3) unless the speed recorded is six or more miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit. Furthermore, no person may be convicted upon evidence obtained through the use of devices authorized by paragraph (3) in an area where the legal speed limit is less than 55 miles per hour if the speed recorded is less than ten miles per hour in excess of the legal speed limit. This paragraph shall not apply to evidence obtained through the use of devices authorized by paragraph (2) or (3) within a school zone or an active work zone.(5) Light detection and ranging devices, commonly referred to as LIDAR, may be used only as part of an automated speed enforcement system or by members of the Pennsylvania State Police.] Additional speed timing devices authorized.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the rate of speed of any vehicle may be timed on any highway by a police officer using a mechanical, electrical and electronic device.(2) RADAR may be used only as part of an automated speed enforcement system, by members of the Pennsylvania State Police, police officers of the Delaware River Port Authority or by local law enforcement officers under section 3362.1 (relating to maximum speed limits enforced by local law enforcement officers with RADAR).(3) LIDAR may only be used as part of an automated speed enforcement system or by members of the Pennsylvania State Police.(4) RADAR in motion may only be used by members of the 20250SB0509PN0495 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania State Police.(d) Classification, approval and testing of mechanical, electrical and electronic devices and RADAR.--[The department may, by regulation, classify specific devices as being mechanical, electrical or electronic. All mechanical, electrical or electronic devices shall be of a type approved by the department, which shall appoint stations for calibrating and testing the devices and may prescribe regulations as to the manner in which calibrations and tests shall be made. The certification and calibration of electronic devices under subsection (c)(3) shall also include the certification and calibration of all equipment, timing strips and other devices which are actually used with the particular electronic device being certified and calibrated. Electronic devices commonly referred to as electronic speed meters or radar shall have been tested for accuracy within a period of one year prior to the alleged violation. Other devices shall have been tested for accuracy within a period of 60 days prior to the alleged violation. A certificate from the station showing that the calibration and test were made within the required period and that the device was accurate shall be competent and prima facie evidence of those facts in every proceeding in which a violation of this title is charged.](1) The department may, by regulation, classify specific devices as being mechanical, electrical or electronic in accordance with a mechanical, electrical and electronic device.(2) All mechanical, electrical and electronic devices shall be of a type approved by the department, which shall appoint stations for calibrating and testing the devices and 20250SB0509PN0495 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may prescribe regulations as to the manner in which calibrations and tests shall be made.(3) The certification and calibration of mechanical, electrical and electronic devices, as appropriate, shall also include the certification and calibration of all equipment, timing strips and other devices which are actually used with the particular device being certified and calibrated.(4) RADAR and RADAR in motion shall have been tested for accuracy within a period of one year prior to the alleged violation.(5) Mechanical, electrical and electronic devices shall have been tested for accuracy within a period of 60 days prior to the alleged violation.(6) A certificate from the station showing that the calibration and test were made within the required period and that the device was accurate shall be competent and prima facie evidence of those facts in every proceeding in which a violation of this title is charged. A certificate of accuracy may be completed, signed and submitted electronically by the certifying technician on a form provided by the department.(7) (i) The department may promulgate regulations for the classification, calibration, testing, certification and use of a mechanical, electrical and electronic device, RADAR, RADAR in motion and a speedometer. In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this subsection, the department shall promulgate temporary regulations, which shall not be subject to:(A) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.20250SB0509PN0495 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(C) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(D) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(ii) Temporary regulations adopted under this paragraph shall expire after three years or upon promulgation of final regulations for this subsection, whichever is sooner.(e) Distance requirements [for use of mechanical, electrical and electronic devices.--Mechanical,].--LIDAR, mechanical, electrical [or] and electronic devices, RADAR, RADAR in motion and a speedometer may not be used to time the rate of speed of vehicles within 500 feet after a speed limit sign indicating a decrease of speed. This limitation on the use of speed timing devices shall not apply to speed limit signs indicating school zones, bridge and elevated structure speed limits, hazardous grade speed limits and work zone speed limits.(f) LIDAR testing and calibration.--(1) The department may, upon publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin, provide that LIDAR speed measuring devices and LIDAR systems shall be calibrated and tested using the testing procedures in department regulation.(2) LIDAR speed measuring devices and LIDAR systems shall be calibrated and tested every 365 days at a minimum before being utilized by the Pennsylvania State Police or as part of an automated speed enforcement system.20250SB0509PN0495 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The certification that the LIDAR device and system, as applicable, have been tested and found to be accurate shall create a presumption that the requirements of this subsection have been fulfilled.[(4) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"LIDAR." The technology of measuring target range using reflected light to determine target range and speed from the time-of-flight of laser pulses."LIDAR speed-measuring device." Speed-measuring equipment that determines target range and speed based on the time-of-flight of laser light pulses reflected off a target."LIDAR system." A LIDAR speed-measuring device that incorporates additional equipment that is used to gather, process and record images, as applicable, to be used as part of speed enforcement efforts.](4) (i) The department may promulgate regulations for the certification and use of LIDAR. In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this subsection, the department may promulgate temporary regulations, which shall not be subject to:(A) Section 612 of The Administrative Code of 1929.(B) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the Commonwealth Documents Law.(C) Section 204(b) of the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(D) The Regulatory Review Act. (ii) Temporary regulations adopted under this 20250SB0509PN0495 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph shall expire after three years or upon promulgation of final regulations for this subsection, whichever is sooner.Section 5. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment or addition of 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 3362.1(b)(2) and 3368(d)(7) shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0509PN0495 - 16 - 123456789